Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
CREATION, ALTERATION, AND

TERMINATION
OF CONDOMINIUMS

§514A-11 Recordation and contents of
declaration. The bureau of conveyances and the land court shall
immediately set up the mechanics and method by which recordation of a master
deed or lease and the declaration may be made. Provisions shall be made for
the recordation of instruments affecting the individual apartments on
subsequent resales, mortgages, and other encumbrances, as is done with all
other real estate recordations; provided that land court certificates of title
shall not be issued for apartments. The declaration to which section 514A-20
refers shall express the following particulars:

(1) Description of the land, whether leased or in fee
simple, on which the building or buildings and improvements are or are to be
located;

(2) Description of the building or buildings, stating
the number of stories and basements, the number of apartments, and the
principal materials of which it or they is or are constructed or to be
constructed;

(3) The apartment number of each apartment, and a
statement of its location, approximate area, number of rooms, immediate common
element to which it has access, designated parking stall if considered a
limited common element, and any other data necessary for its proper
identification;

(4) Description of the common elements;

(5) Description of the limited common elements, if
any, stating to which apartments their use is reserved;

(6) The percentage of undivided interest in the
common elements appertaining to each apartment and its owner for all purposes,
including voting;

(7) Statement of the purposes for which the building
or buildings and each of the apartments are intended and restricted as to use;

(8) The name of a person to receive service of process
in the cases hereinafter provided, together with the residence or place of
business of the person which shall be within the county in which the property
is located;

(9) Provision as to the percentage of votes by the
apartment owners which shall be determinative of whether to rebuild, repair, or
restore the property in the event of damage or destruction of all or part of
the property;

(10) Any further details in connection with the
property that the person executing the declaration may deem desirable to set
forth consistent with this chapter;

(11) The method by which the declaration may be
amended, consistent with this chapter; provided that an amendment to the
declarations of all condominium projects existing as of May 22, 1991, and all
condominium projects created thereafter shall require a vote or written consent
of seventy-five per cent of all apartment owners, except as otherwise provided
in this chapter; provided further that the declarations of condominium projects
having five or fewer apartments may provide for the amendment thereof by a vote
or written consent of more than seventy-five per cent of all apartment owners;

(12) Description as to any additions, deletions,
modifications, and reservations as to the property, including without limitation
provisions concerning the merger or addition of later phases of the project.
To the extent provided in the declaration, an amendment to the declaration that
is made to implement those additions, deletions, modifications, reservations,
or merger provisions shall require the vote or written consent of only the
declarant or such percentage of apartment owners as is provided in the
declaration; and

(13) A declaration subject to the penalties set forth
in section 514A-49(b) that the condominium property regime is in compliance
with all zoning and building ordinances and codes, and all other permitting
requirements pursuant to section 514A-1.6, and specifying in the case of a
property which includes one or more existing structures being converted to
condominium status:

(A) Any variances which have been granted to
achieve such compliance; and

(B) Whether, as the result of the adoption
or amendment of any ordinances or codes, the project presently contains any
legal non-conforming uses or structures;

except
that a property that is registered pursuant to section 514A-31 shall instead
provide this declaration pursuant to [section] 514A-40. [L 1977, c 98, pt of §2
and c 176, §2; am L 1979, c 93, §1; am L 1982, c 160, §1; am L 1984, c 109, §1;
am L 1991, c 44, §1 and c 124, §1; am L 2000, c 251, §3]

Note

Section 514A-1.6 referred to in paragraph (13) is repealed.

Revision Note

"May 22, 1991" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Attorney General Opinions

Agreement between condominium owners and the developer
involving the management and rental of the apartments to the public is subject
to Securities Act. Att. Gen. Op. 66-12.

Law Journals and Reviews

Condominiums and The Sale of Securities Act. 4 HBJ, Feb
1967, at 4.

Honolulu's Ohana Zoning Law: To Ohana or Not to Ohana. 13
UH L. Rev. 505.

Case Notes

Regime; when created. 50 H. 540, 445 P.2d 109.

Amendment of declaration. 62 H. 188, 613 P.2d 1315.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next